Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.110

Cessation of operations—Financial statement—Official record.

(1) Following the period provided by RCW 44.05.100(1) for the commission's adoption of a plan, the commission shall take all necessary steps to conclude its business and cease operations. The commission shall prepare a financial statement disclosing all expenditures made by the commission. The official record shall contain all relevant information developed by the commission pursuant to carrying out its duties under this chapter, maps, data collected, minutes of meetings, written communications, and other information of a similar nature. Once the commission ceases to exist, the chief election officer shall be the custodian of the official record for purposes of reprecincting and election administration. The chief election officer shall provide for the permanent preservation of this official record pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW and Title 40 RCW. Once the commission ceases to exist any budget surplus shall revert to the state general fund.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 44.05.120 for a reconvened commission, the commission shall cease to exist on July 1st of each year ending in two unless the supreme court extends the commission's term.

[ 2011 c 60 s 43; 1983 c 16 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.